Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-161.01
Competitive bids; time requirements; waiver.

A minimum of fifteen days shall elapse between the time formal bids are advertised and the time of their opening, except that this requirement may be waived by the materiel administrator upon a showing by the using agency of an emergency, sole or specialized source, or other unique requirement.

Laws 1963, c. 508, § 10, p. 1620;

Laws 1975, LB 447, § 4;

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 6;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 14.